Utah statutes.
63A-3-503.   Legal services.

The Office of the Attorney General shall:

(1)  provide to the office all legal services and advice related to the collection of accounts receivable owed to the state; and

(2)  establish policies governing:

(a)  legal matters involving accounts receivable; and

(b)  litigation of past-due accounts receivable.

